North Carolina, session 2025, SB611.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-7(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) Duration and Renewal of Licenses. – Drivers licenses shall be issued and renewed
pursuant to the provisions of this subsection:
…
(6) Remote renewal or conversion. – Subject to the following requirements and
limitations, the Division may offer remote renewal of a drivers license or
remote conversion of a full provisional license issued by the Division:
a. Requirements. – To be eligible for remote renewal or conversion under
this subdivision, a person must meet all of the following requirements:
…
4. For a remote renewal, renewal:
I. Of a license that complies with regulations adopted
pursuant to the REAL ID Act of 2005, 49 U.S.C. §
30301, the most recent renewal was an in-person
renewal and not a remote renewal under this
subdivision.
II. Of a drivers license that is not REAL ID compliant, a
person may remotely renew a license on two
consecutive occasions. After two consecutive remote
renewals, a non-REAL ID compliant license shall be
renewed in person.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026, and applies to licenses
renewed on or after that date.
*S611-v-1*